Tennessee, session 114, SB0418.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 29-20-403(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(5) Minimum limits of not less than seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000) for bodily injury or death of any one (1) person in any one (1) accident,
occurrence, or act, and not less than one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) for bodily injury or death of all persons in any one (1) accident, occurrence,
or act, and two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for injury or destruction of
property of others in any one (1) accident, occurrence, or act. This subdivision (b)(5)
shall apply to any action arising on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0418
000119
- 1 -